dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# Phonetic equivalence rules: lower edit-distance penalty between mistyped and
# correct candidates that sound alike (silent ğ, metathesis, suffix reduction).
PHONE 13
PHONE deil tegil
PHONE diil tegil
PHONE ln nl
PHONE iyo iyor
PHONE ğ g
PHONE ş s
PHONE ç c
PHONE ö o
PHONE ü u
PHONE ı i
PHONE â a
PHONE î i
PHONE û u

# STEM CLASS FLAGS

# CASE FLAGS

# PLURAL FLAGS

# 3SG POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# 1SG POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# 2SG POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# 1PL POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# 2PL POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# COPULA FLAGS

# RELATIVE -KI FLAG

# DERIVATION FLAGS (1ST-LEVEL)

# DERIVATION FLAGS (2ND-LEVEL: VERB-FORMING)

# VERB PARADIGM FLAGS

# PREFIX FLAG

# PROPER NOUN CASE/POSSESSIVE FLAGS

# VOICING COPULA FLAGS

SFX ∀ Y 1
SFX ∀ 0 ı [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]

SFX ∁ Y 1
SFX ∁ 0 u [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]

SFX ∂ Y 1
SFX ∂ 0 i [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]

SFX ∃ Y 1
SFX ∃ 0 ü [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]

SFX ∄ Y 1
SFX ∄ 0 0 .

SFX ∅ Y 1
SFX ∅ 0 0 .

SFX ∆ Y 1
SFX ∆ 0 0 .

SFX ∇ Y 1
SFX ∇ 0 0 .
