dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
aksatış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
alicenaplığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
alçaltıcı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
amnios/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎≎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
antarktiğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
antioksidan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
apostrof/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
arayüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩≎∍≍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
arkalıksız/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
armudumsu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
asık suratlı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
asım takım/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
AUFF/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
aç/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∌∍∗
ağırlanış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
aşevi/∊∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
aşı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∌∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
BAT/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∌∍≍∗⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
BAY/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪∌∍≍∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
başbuğ/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∪≎∌∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
başgarson/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
başkaca/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
başörtüsü/∋∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
BCEAO/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
beleş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∌∍
Bestway/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
BIN/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪∌∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
birdirbir/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
Bohr/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
boyunlu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∪∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
boyutsuzluğ/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
Branagh'ın/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
brisa/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍
brom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
bugünlüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
byers/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍
Bytom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
bâbur/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
bünyad/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
bürümcüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
bıttım/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Caferoğlu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍∥
CATHARINA/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Charlson/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Chen/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
chopın/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
Cisco/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
cnıl/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
Columbus/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
COMSOL/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Cund/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
curevac/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
Cârim/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
cündioğlu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
cürhüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∍
cızıltılı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dayılanış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dekar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dendroloğ/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
Diabetes/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
dikenlisalyangoz/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
DMYO/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
dolaşılma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
doğalyıkım/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Dragunov/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
dresden/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∍
DROPS/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
dublajcılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
duyarlıkölçüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
dünürlüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
dınpro/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
ebob/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
ebuaş/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
ecocerd/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
editörlüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
ekşiyonca/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
elmalığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
enformasyon/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎≎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
engelleyim/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
epirus/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍
erbaş/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
eylemciliğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
filato/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
floc/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
flörtsüzlüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
formalitesiz/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
fotios/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
frengistan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Fukushima/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Gando/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
garazsız/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∪∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
gergin/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍∗∘∖
gnkur/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
Gnkur./∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
gondar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
Gondvana/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
goro/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
grandük/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
Guayaquil/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
görüntücülüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
güler yüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
güğüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∌∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
Gıyaseddin/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
halay/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∌∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
harlağ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
hayatağacı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hematom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
hemşo/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∪∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Hilmi'den/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
hortum/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∪≎∌∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Hussam/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hüngür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍
hıbbân/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
iason/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
ICNA/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
idealistliğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
iglo/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍
ilhakçılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
IPTC/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
irec/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
itimatlı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Ivanow/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
içakışlılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
İBÜN/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
İKEV/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
jacopo/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
Japarov/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
kalaysız/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kalça/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩≎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kalış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kambriyum/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
kansu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
karbonsuz/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∪∍∘⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
katrançamı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kaynatalığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
kem küm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
kerhen/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∍
KKDIK/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Klavuzu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
kolalanma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kolostrum/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
konkur/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎≎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
kosinüs/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
kozacılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
kumotu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Kunz/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
kâhta/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
köpüksüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
Künç/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
kırlığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
kıtmir/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
kıyın/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
laos/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
leandro/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
LEICA/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
libor/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
literatür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪∍≍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
lokantacılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
lulu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
lumion/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
mahdum/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
makaslı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
mazhar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
meisel/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍
mensur/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
mercan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪≎∌∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Mersu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Mes'ûd/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Meszöly/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
mezuza/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍
motamod/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
muharriş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍
muzumsu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
mübahlığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
mümkünsüzlüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
münasebat/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Nakaya/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
NAVIGON/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
nigel/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍
nixon/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
nişastacılığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
Nuhkuyusu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Ockham'ın/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
okyanus/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍≍
olanaksızlaşma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Opuz/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
orhunöz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍
Orso/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
OSRAM/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Paestum/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Pafos/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
pamplona/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
panço/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
pat/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩≎∌∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
pektin/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
PFAFF/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
PlayStation/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
polinom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍≍
ponsetya/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
portföy/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩≎∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
protestolu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
radyoölçüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
riboz/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
Rifat'ın/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
RIFF/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ronaldinho/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍
Roslyn/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Rouen/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
Rubella/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sapına kadar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sarıgöl/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
satranççı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
savul/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
Sb./∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
SHIMANO/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
siyer/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩≎∌∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
Skopelos/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
sodyum nitrad/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
sonsuzlaşma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
soyud/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
sunu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩≎∌∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
sükût/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
süslülüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
sütü bozuğ/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
sıradan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∪∌∍∗∘
sızdırmazlığ/∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽≕XX
tb'liğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
telaşlanma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
temayüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
topu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∪∍
trabzonluluğ/∁≣∬≃∳∷∾≁≕XX
Trafalgar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
tromp/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∩∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
tüp/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
tüvasaş/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
tüzüksel/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
ufuklu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∪∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
uful/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
vacon/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
Valday/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
vardacı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
viacom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
vicario/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
WUSHU/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∌∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
wwoof/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
xcom/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
yaklaştırım/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
yalınlaştırılış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
yenileyiş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
yetersayı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
yürüklüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
ZBAM/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ZOLAN/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
çiftvuruş/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
çim çim/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
çocuklaştırma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Çörtoğlu/∇≦⊆∧≋≭≪≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍∥
çıngıl/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∩∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
öbür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍∣
ötücülüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX
ütğm./√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍
ımtihan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
ınox/∅∁≣∧≋∬∡≉∺≃∳∷∾≁∎∍
şamlılar/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍
şekerliğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX
şuursuzlaşma/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
